Arkansas, session 2025, HB1711.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 14, Chapter 186, Subchapter 2, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
14-186-216. Municipal port authority police force — Establishment —
Powers and duties.
(a)(1) A municipal port authority may:
(A) Establish and organize a municipal port authority
police force;
(B) Appoint one (1) or more persons as a municipal port
authority law enforcement officer to aid and supplement the law enforcement
agencies of this state in the protection of the persons, property, and
facilities of the municipal port authority; and
*ZRC064*
03-18-2025 10:33:28 ZRC064

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1711
(C) Apply for a grant applicable to law enforcement in
order to support the funding of a municipal port authority police force.
(2) A municipal port authority that establishes and organizes a
municipal port authority police force under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this
section may fund the municipal port authority police force using:
(A) Fees collected by the municipal port authority from
the operations of the municipal port authority authorized under this
subchapter; and
(B) Funds received from grants.
(3) A municipal port authority police force established and
organized under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section shall exercise
concurrent jurisdiction with law enforcement of the municipality and of the
county in which the municipal port authority facilities are located.
(b)(1) A municipal port authority law enforcement officer appointed
under this section shall:
(A) Be a certified law enforcement officer under § 12-9-
101 et seq; and
(B) Except to the extent limited by the municipal port
authority:
(i) Protect the property of the municipal port
authority;
(ii) Preserve and maintain proper order and decorum
on the property of the municipal port authority;
(iii) Prevent unlawful assemblies and disorderly
conduct on the property of the municipal port authority;
(iv) Cooperate with law enforcement agencies and
officers having jurisdiction where the property and facilities of the
municipal port authority are located; and
(v) Exclude and eject persons from and prevent
trespass upon the property, facilities, and waterways under the control of
the municipal port authority.
(2) A municipal port authority law enforcement officer appointed
under this section may:
(A) Arrest a person under § 16-81-106(b) and (c), whether
on or off the property of the municipal port authority, for the violation of
a law on the property of the municipal port authority;
03-18-2025 10:33:28 ZRC064

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1711
(B) Carry weapons for the reasonable purposes of carrying
out the duties of a municipal port authority law enforcement officer;
(C) Regulate the operation and parking of motor vehicles
on the grounds of the municipal port authority and other grounds under the
control of the municipal port authority;
(D) Regulate the operation and docking of watercraft on
the waterways under the control of the municipal port authority and on all
waterways adjoining and traversing the waterways and property of the
municipal port authority; and
(E) Patrol:
(i) The industrial facilities of the municipal port
authority;
(ii) The portion of roads adjacent to the perimeter
of the grounds of the municipal port authority;
(iii) The portion of a shore or bank of a waterway
that is adjacent to the grounds of the municipal port authority; and
(iv) Navigable waterways adjacent to the facilities
of the municipal port authority in a distance not to exceed five (5) miles
upriver or downriver from the facilities of the municipal port authority.
(c) A municipal port authority may promulgate rules providing for the
operation and organization of a municipal port authority police force.

/s/Unger













03-18-2025 10:33:28 ZRC064